Hawaii statutes.
§302A-1160 Student's health record.
The department of education shall provide student health record forms for
immunization and physical examination to the schools, private physicians,
advanced practice registered nurses, and authorized personnel of the department
of health. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2; am L 1998, c 60, §5; am L 2000, c 109, §4]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next